Washington statutes.
RCW 36.37.020

Property may be acquired for fairs.

The board of county commissioners of any county in the state may acquire by gift, devise, purchase, condemnation and purchase, or otherwise, lands, property rights, leases, easements, and all kinds of personal property and own and hold the same and construct and maintain temporary or permanent improvements suitable and necessary for the purpose of holding and maintaining county or district fairs for the exhibition of county or district resources and products.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.37.020. Prior: 1947 c 184 s 2; 1917 c 32 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2751.]